New York, session 2025-2026, A10052.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 4 of chapter 443 of the laws of 2006, amending the 2 tax law relating to authorizing the town of Red Hook to impose a real 3 estate transfer tax with revenues therefrom to be deposited in said 4 community preservation fund, is amended to read as follows: 5 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 6 section two of this act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it 7 shall have become a law and shall expire December 31, [2026] 2051 when 8 upon such date the provisions of such section shall be deemed repealed. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14450-01-6